District of Columbia statutes.
47-2855.05

Collection and deposit of fees.

All fees collected by the Department under this subchapter shall be deposited with the D.C. treasurer and credited to the Corporate Recordation Fund (“Fund”) as defined in § 29-102.13.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2005(b), 46 DCR 3142
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 4(e), 59 DCR 13171

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2855.5.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “Corporate Recordation Fund (“Fund”) as defined in § 29-102.13” for “master business license fund as defined in § 47-2851.13.”

Effect of Amendments

Short title of title II of Law 12-261: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2855.01.

Short Title

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes